Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1878.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 68 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 56MANAGED NATIVE CONSERVATION LANDSCAPINGSec.5601. Definitions.5602. Prohibition of deed restrictions pertaining to managed native conservation landscaping.§ 5601. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:1234567891011121314151617 "Managed native conservation landscaping."(1) Planned, intentional and maintained planting of native plants, including rain gardens, pollinator gardens and pollinator meadows, that does at least one of the following:(i) Incorporates environmentally sensitive design to help meet this Commonwealth's water quality standards and storm water management, including commitments to address storm water runoff and reduce pollution, both locally and in the most recent Chesapeake Bay Total Maximum Daily Load Watershed Implementation Plan.(ii) Protects water quality through improved filtration.(iii) Improves storm water management through increased infiltration.(iv) Supports native pollinators and wildlife by providing native vegetation habitat.(2) The term does not include turf grass lawns left unattended or the use or maintenance of a noxious weed."Noxious weed." A plant listed in 7 CFR 360.200 (relating to designation of noxious weeds) or listed as a noxious weed under 3 Pa.C.S. § 1519 (relating to noxious weed list).§ 5602. Prohibition of deed restrictions pertaining to managed native conservation landscaping.(a) Prohibition.-- Except as provided under subsections (b) and (c), no deed restriction, covenant or binding agreement running with the land may prohibit or have the effect of prohibiting an owner from installing managed native conservation landscaping on the owner's property. An association as defined under section 3103 (relating to definitions) or 5103 (relating to definitions) may establish reasonable restrictions concerning 20250HB1878PN2335 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the management, design and aesthetic guidelines for managed native conservation landscape features.(b) Unreasonable restriction.--A restriction shall be deemed unreasonable if the restriction:(1) Significantly increases the cost of managed native conservation landscaping.(2) Significantly decreases the efficiency or viability of managed native conservation landscaping.(3) Requires cultivated vegetation to consist in whole or in part of turf grass.(4) Prohibits managed native conservation landscaping from being used in the front or visible areas of a property.(5) Limits the use of managed native conservation landscaping to a percentage of the owner's property acreage.(c) Exceptions.--The governing documents of an association created under Subpart B (relating to condominiums) or D (relating to planned communities) of Part II may prohibit or restrict the use of managed native conservation landscaping on the common elements or common areas within the condominium or planned community served by the association.(d) Application.--This chapter shall not apply to a restriction on use imposed upon any real property designated as a historic property or historic resource, as those terms are defined under 37 Pa.C.S. § 103 (relating to definitions).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1878PN2335 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425